Illinois, session 104th, SB1906.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prescription Drug Purchasing Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. The Prescription Drug Purchasing Task Force. 7There is hereby created a Prescription Drug Purchasing Task 8Force in the Department of Healthcare and Family Services to 9study the different ways that other states are using 10multistate prescription drug purchasing pools to increase the 11State's negotiating power and lower prices for patients. The 12Task Force shall consist of the following members:13        (1) four members shall be appointed by the Governor as 14    follows:15            (A) one physician licensed to practice medicine in 16        all its branches; 17            (B) one pharmacist; 18            (C) one clinical representative from a statewide 19        organization representing hospitals; and20            (D) one member from the general public; 21        (2) one member shall be appointed by the Senate 22    President;23        (3) one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of   SB1906- 2 -LRB104 09739 BDA 19805 b1    the Illinois House of Representatives;2        (4) one member shall be appointed by the Minority 3    Leader of the Illinois Senate;4        (5) one member shall be appointed by the Minority 5    Leader of the Illinois House of Representatives;6        (6) one member shall be the Director of Public Health, 7    or his or her designee;8        (7) one member shall be the Director of Central 9    Management Services, or his or her designee;10        (8) one member shall be the Director of Healthcare and 11    Family Services, or his or her designee; and12        (9) one member shall be the Director of Insurance, or 13    his or her designee.14    Members shall serve 2-year terms. Members shall be 15appointed within 30 days after the effective date of this Act.16    The Task Force may appoint a chairperson by majority vote 17and other officers as it deems appropriate.18    The members of the Task Force shall receive no 19compensation for their services as members of the Task Force.20    No member of the Task Force shall have any financial 21association or fiduciary interest in any pharmaceutical 22company. 23    Section 10. Duties. The Task Force shall:24        (1) identify a plan to enable the State to bulk 25    purchase prescription drugs, including, but not limited   SB1906- 3 -LRB104 09739 BDA 19805 b1    to, identifying what other states are doing to purchase 2    prescription drugs in bulk;3        (2) recommend ways the State can negotiate with 4    wholesalers and manufacturers in order to cut drug prices, 5    including, but not limited to, Medicaid prices;6        (3) identify and make recommendations for the State to 7    join an existing interstate bulk purchasing pool in order 8    to cut prices for prescription drugs; and9        (4) identify high cost prescription drugs that are 10    also in high demand in the State, and identify price 11    ranges for those drugs in Illinois compared to other 12    states. 13    Section 15. Administrative support. The Department of 14Healthcare and Family Services shall provide administrative 15and other support to the Task Force. 16    Section 20. Report. On or before July 31, 2026, the Task 17Force shall report its findings and recommendations to the 18General Assembly, by filing copies of its report as provided 19in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act, and 20to the Governor.  21    Section 25. Task Force abolished. The Prescription Drug 22Purchasing Task Force is abolished and this Act is repealed on 23January 1, 2027.